Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 3 State Budget

35-3-1.
Budget officer — General powers and duties.

Within the office of management and budget there shall be a budget officer who shall be appointed by the director of administration with the approval of the governor. The budget officer shall be required to:

Exercise budgetary control over all state departments and agencies and perform management analyses;

Operate an appropriation allotment system;

Prepare the annual budget of the receipts and expenditures of the state;

Develop long term activity and financial programs, particularly capital improvement programs;

Approve or disapprove all requests for new personnel and to investigate periodically the need of all existing positions in the state service and report thereon to the director of administration; and

Prepare a five (5) year financial projection of anticipated general revenue receipts and expenditures, including detail of principal revenue sources and expenditures by major program areas, which projection shall be included in the budget submitted to the general assembly pursuant to §

35-3-7

.

The budget officer may approve or disapprove requisitions for equipment, materials, and supplies.

The budget officer’s duties and powers relating to budgetary controls and personnel requests of the legislative and judicial departments shall be purely ministerial, concerned only with the availability of the funds, and in no event shall the budget officer interpose his or her judgment regarding the wisdom or expediency of items of expenditure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 62; P.L. 1956, ch. 3696, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, art. xvi, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 7.

35-3-2.
Annual appropriations for state government.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary to pay the administrative and other expenses of the state government.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-2

.

35-3-3.
Responsibility of budget officer for budget.

The budget officer shall, under the supervision of the governor, prepare the annual state budget, assembling, correlating, and revising the estimates of revenues and requests for appropriations of the various departments of the state government.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 881, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1922, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-3

.

35-3-3.1.
Responsibility of budget officer for budget of resource recovery corporation.

On or before December 1 of each year, the budget officer shall review the annual budget submitted by the resource recovery corporation, making such recommendations as he or she may deem proper to the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 523, § 1.

35-3-4.
Estimates submitted by department heads.

On dates determined by the budget officer, but not later than the first day of October in each year, each head of a department of the state government, not including the general assembly or the judiciary, shall assemble, correlate, and revise, with power to increase or decrease, the estimates for expenditures and requests for appropriations for the next ensuing fiscal year of each of the divisions, boards, commissions, officers, bureaus, institutions, or agencies of the state included within his or her department, and, after this revision, shall prepare an itemized departmental estimate of the appropriations necessary to meet the financial needs of the department, including a statement in detail of all moneys for which any general or special appropriation is desired at the ensuing session of the general assembly. The estimate shall be in such form, and in such number of copies, and with such explanation as the budget officer may require, and, on dates determined by the budget officer, but not later than the first day of October in each year, shall be submitted to the governor through the budget officer and to the fiscal advisors of the house and senate.

The estimates shall also include a supplemental presentation of estimates of expenditures for information resources and information technologies as defined in § 29-8-2 [repealed], regardless of source of financing. The estimate shall include a detailed listing and explanation of expenses and the source of funds and shall be in such form, and in such number of copies, and with such explanation as the budget officer may require. Copies shall be provided directly to the house fiscal advisor, the senate fiscal advisor, and the Rhode Island information resources management board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 881, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1922, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-4

; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 45, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 14; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 12, § 2.

35-3-4.1.
Department of transportation budget — Tort claims.

In submitting the estimates for expenditures and requests for appropriations, the director of the department of transportation shall provide an estimate of the funds necessary for paying tort claims made pursuant to §

24-8-35

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 380, § 1.

35-3-4.2.
Zero base budget review.

The chairperson of the house finance committee and/or the chairperson of the senate finance committee may, from time to time, designate one or more departments to submit zero base budgets. The committee(s) shall consider the objectives, operations, measures of performance, and costs of all activities of each department; explore alternative means of conducting the activities of each department; and evaluate alternative budget amounts for various levels of effort for each activity of each department.

The committee(s) shall begin zero base budget reviews at the beginning of the fiscal year, and shall complete analysis prior to the governor’s submission of the budget as required in §

35-3-7

. Prior to August 1, the chairperson(s) shall communicate to the departments so designated the form and number of copies, and with such explanation as the committee(s) may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 38, § 1.

35-3-5.
Estimates for legislature and judiciary.

Itemized estimates of the financial needs of the legislature and of the judiciary shall be submitted, without revision, by the budget officer to the governor on or before the first day of October for inclusion in the budget. The Governor shall submit the financial needs as requested by the legislature and judiciary without revision for inclusion in the budget recommendation to the general assembly. The budget officer shall provide copies to the House Fiscal Advisor and the Senate Fiscal Advisor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 881, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1922, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-5

; P.L. 1998, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 3.

35-3-6.
Compensation of outside personnel employed in preparation of budget.

Whenever the budget officer shall deem it advisable or necessary to require the attendance of any person other than the director of a department or a person employed by the state in the classified service, to aid and assist him or her in the preparation of the annual budget, the budget officer may compensate the person for his or her attendance and other necessary expenses.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; P.L. 1947, ch. 1922, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-6

.

35-3-7.
Submission of budget to general assembly — Contents.

On or before the third Thursday in January in each year of each January session of the general assembly, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget containing a complete plan of estimated revenues and proposed expenditures, with a personnel supplement detailing the number and titles of positions of each agency and the estimates of personnel costs for the next fiscal year, and with the inventory required by §

35-1.1-3(b)(5)

. Provided, however, in those years that a new governor is inaugurated, the new governor shall submit the budget on or before the first Thursday in February. In the budget the governor may set forth in summary and detail:

Estimates of the receipts of the state during the ensuing fiscal year under laws existing at the time the budget is transmitted and also under the revenue proposals, if any, contained in the budget, and comparisons with the estimated receipts of the state during the current fiscal year, as well as actual receipts of the state for the last two (2) completed fiscal years.

Estimates of the expenditures and appropriations necessary in the governor’s judgment for the support of the state government for the ensuing fiscal year, and comparisons with appropriations for expenditures during the current fiscal year, as well as actual expenditures of the state for the last two (2) complete fiscal years; provided, further, in the event the budget submission includes any transfers of resources from public corporations to the general fund, the budget submission shall also include alternatives to said transfers.

Financial statements of the:

Condition of the treasury at the end of the last completed fiscal year;

Estimated condition of the treasury at the end of the current fiscal year; and

Estimated condition of the treasury at the end of the ensuing fiscal year if the financial proposals contained in the budget are adopted.

All essential facts regarding the bonded and other indebtedness of the state.

A report indicating those program revenues and expenditures whose funding source is proposed to be changed from state appropriations to restricted receipts, or from restricted receipts to other funding sources.

Such other financial statements and data as in the governor’s opinion are necessary or desirable.

Any other provision of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the proposed appropriations submitted by the governor to the general assembly for the next ensuing fiscal year should not be more than five and one-half percent (5.5%) in excess of total state appropriations, excluding any estimated supplemental appropriations, enacted by the general assembly for the fiscal year previous to that for which the proposed appropriations are being submitted; provided that the increased state-share provisions required to achieve fifty percent (50%) state financing of local school operations as provided for in P.L. 1985, ch. 182, shall be excluded from the definition of total appropriations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, not later than the fourth (4th) Thursday in January 2005.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a supplemental budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, and/or a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, not later than Thursday, January 26, 2006.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a supplemental budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, and/or a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, not later than Wednesday, January 31, 2007.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012, not later than Thursday, March 10, 2011.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2013, not later than Tuesday, January 31, 2012.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, not later than Thursday, March 12, 2015.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, not later than Thursday, March 11, 2021.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 881, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1922, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-7

; P.L. 1977, ch. 200, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 174, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 245, art. VI, § 1; P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 450, § 5; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 155, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 209, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 55; P.L. 2015, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 9; P.L. 2020, ch. 80, art. 1, § 36.

35-3-7.1.
Biennial capital development program.

Biennially, for presentation to the voters at the next general election, a comprehensive plan detailing the capital goods and services required in the upcoming two (2) year period will be presented.

The plan shall also include consideration of the current capital indebtedness and the proposed capital requirements for all independent authorities created under and by the laws of this state.

All capital referenda will be presented to the voters at a general election, except, upon a finding of compelling need for the public health, safety, or welfare, the general assembly may present the capital program at a time other than the general election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 12, § 1.

35-3-7.2.
Budget officer as capital development officer.

The budget officer shall be a capital development program officer who shall be responsible for:

The review of all capital development requests submitted by the various state departments, as set forth in chapter 6 of title 42, which shall include all independent boards and commissions and the capital development plans of the Narragansett Bay Commission, Rhode Island infrastructure bank, the Lottery Commission, and all other public corporations, as defined in chapter 18 of this title which plans would be subject to the provisions of §

35-18-3

; provided, that, except as provided for in this section, nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the powers of the council on postsecondary education as outlined in chapter 59 of title 16. Capital development requests and plans shall be submitted in such form, with such explanation, in such number of copies, and by such date as the budget officer may require. Copies shall also be provided directly to the house fiscal advisor and the senate fiscal advisor.

Preparation of a capital budget which shall specify which capital items are proposed for presentation to the electorate at the next general election.

The activities which will promote capital development planning and develop criteria which can be used to determine appropriate levels of bonded indebtedness.

Acting as chairperson of the capital development planning and oversight commission which is to be appointed by the governor. The commission, in addition to recommending to the governor the biennial capital budget, shall implement a long-range capital development planning process and shall be responsible for the development of an inventory of state assets to determine the need and prioritization of capital improvements.

Working with the council on postsecondary education in the development by the council of that portion of the council’s capital development program involving annual general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 5, § 14; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 21, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 3.

35-3-8.
Recommendations to meet deficiencies — Submission of appropriation bills.

The budget shall also contain the recommendations of the governor to the general assembly for new taxes, loans, or other appropriate actions to meet any estimated deficiency for the ensuing fiscal year. It shall also be accompanied by a bill or bills for all proposed appropriations.

In the event that any departments of state government are expected to incur a deficiency within the current fiscal year, the governor shall, on or before the third Thursday in January each year, submit a request for supplemental appropriations on their behalf. Provided, however, in those years that a new governor is inaugurated, the new governor shall submit the request on or before the first Thursday in February. In the event that, prior to or subsequent to the request, the governor determines that additional deficiencies are expected to be incurred, the governor shall submit requests for additional appropriations upon notice of these deficiencies.

The request presented to the general assembly shall identify the proposed increases and decreases to the original amounts provided in the annual appropriation act provided, that no action shall be taken that will cause an excess of appropriations for revenue expenditures over expected revenue receipts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-8

; P.L. 1984, ch. 245, art. XIV, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 5.

35-3-9.
Action on bills by house committee — Hearings.

The budget plan and bill or bills for proposed appropriations, when sent by the governor to the general assembly, shall be referred as soon as practicable to an appropriate committee of the house of representatives, and the committee shall forthwith proceed to the consideration of the bill. The committee shall hear the budget officer upon the bill as a whole or upon any item thereof or any proposed amendment thereto as each may elect, and the committee may summon the budget officer to appear before it and to furnish such information relative to the bill or any item therein, or any proposed amendment thereto, as it may require, and the committee may in its discretion hear the proper person representing any department or agency desiring to be heard with respect to any item or amendment in the bill relating to the department or agency; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the right of the committee to hold public hearings upon the bill as a whole or upon any item therein, or to summon any person for examination regarding any item contained therein, or for the purpose of obtaining information necessary for a full and proper consideration of the bill. The committee, after the consideration of the bill, shall report the bill with its recommendation endorsed thereon to the house of representatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 62; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-9

.

35-3-10.
Consideration of bill by senate committee.

The bill, after passage by the house of representatives in its original form as transmitted by the governor, or as amended by the house, shall be transmitted to and received by the senate in the same manner as other bills are transmitted and received, and, upon receipt thereof by the senate, it shall forthwith be referred to an appropriate committee, which shall proceed to the consideration of the bill in the manner as provided in §

35-3-9

for the consideration of the bill by the committee of the house of representatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-10

.

35-3-11.
Consideration of budget by senate.

The bill, with the endorsement of the committee of the senate thereon, shall be considered by the senate in accordance with the joint rules and orders and rules of the senate, and may be amended in such manner as the senate may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-11

.

35-3-12.
Supplements and amendments offered by governor.

The governor, before final action by the general assembly, may offer a supplement to the budget and submit amendments in conformity therewith to the accompanying appropriation bill or bills.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-12

.

35-3-13.
Revenue appropriations to be within expected receipts — Provision of revenue for additional appropriations.

The governor shall submit the budget and the appropriation bill or bills for the fiscal year to the general assembly, which may increase, decrease, alter, or strike out the items contained therein; provided, that no action on its part shall be taken which will cause an excess of appropriations for revenue expenditures over expected revenue receipts. If additional appropriations are deemed necessary by the general assembly, it shall not make the appropriations unless it shall provide the necessary additional revenue therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-13

.

35-3-14.
Receipts credited to general fund — Credit of special receipts to specific appropriations — Fees of attorneys for collection of taxes.

Except as otherwise provided, all revenues of the state, with the exception of funds either exempted in the constitution or held in trust, shall be credited to the general fund, subject to appropriations for all operating expenditures of the state.

The governor and the director of administration, upon the petition of the public works division of the department of transportation, may credit the appropriation accounts of the division, under the proper code designations, with the portions of specific receipts of the division deposited by it with the general treasurer; being sums of money derived from the sale of materials or sums of money received from the various cities and towns for highway work or sums of money received from private sources for highway work, as in the judgment of the director of administration are necessary to prevent a depletion of the specific appropriation account under the code designation.

The state controller may credit the appropriation accounts of the general fund or any special funds of the state with the receipts from the sale of salvage or surplus items of value when the receipts are the direct result of the activity for which the account or fund is established, unless disposition of the receipts is otherwise provided for by law.

Where the director of administration determines that he or she shall engage attorneys to collect delinquent taxes for the tax administrator, authorization to so engage being confirmed hereby, and enters into a written agreement with the attorneys to compensate them on a fee basis for services which they render in effecting the collections, the director is further authorized to permit the attorneys to first deduct the agreed amount of the fee or fees from the amount of collections effected by them, which amount, less the agreed amount of the fee or fees, shall be remitted by the attorneys to the tax administrator within thirty (30) days, and after the deductions, all the remittances shall be credited to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; P.L. 1937, ch. 2512, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; P.L. 1954, ch. 3375, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-14

; P.L. 1964, ch. 58, § 1.

35-3-15.
Unexpended and unencumbered balances of revenue appropriations.

All unexpended or unencumbered balances of general revenue appropriations, whether regular or special appropriations, at the end of any fiscal year, shall revert to the surplus account in the general fund, and may be reappropriated by the governor to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same purposes as the former appropriations; provided, that the disposition of unexpended or unencumbered appropriations for the general assembly and legislative agencies shall be determined by the joint committee on legislative affairs, and written notification given thereof to the state controller within twenty (20) days after the end of the fiscal year; and furthermore that the disposition of unexpended or unencumbered appropriations for the judiciary shall be determined by the state court administrator, and written notification given thereof to the state controller within twenty (20) days after the end of the fiscal year.

The governor shall submit a report of such reappropriations to the chairperson of the house finance committee and the chairperson of the senate finance committee of each reappropriation stating the general revenue appropriation, the unexpended or unencumbered balance, the amount reappropriated, and an explanation of the reappropriation and the reason for the reappropriation by August 20 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-15

; P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 79, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 16, § 11; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 2, § 2.

35-3-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 62; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-16

; P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 5; P.L. 1981, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 41, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 10, effective July 1, 1997.

35-3-17.
Quarterly and monthly allotments.

After the annual appropriation bill or bills have been passed by the general assembly and signed by the governor, the budget officer shall determine by quarterly or monthly allotments, in accordance with seasonal requirements, the division of amounts to be expended under each appropriation. The budget officer shall make this initial determination within forty-five (45) calendar days of the signing of the annual appropriations bill by the governor. A copy of the initial determination shall be forwarded to the chairperson of the house finance committee and the chairperson of the senate finance committee. Copies of subsequent determinations shall be forwarded in like manner when made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 62; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-17

; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 41, § 1.

35-3-17.1.
Financial statements required from state departments, agencies, and instrumentalities.

The several state departments, agencies, and public authorities and corporations shall submit to the fiscal advisors of the house and senate, statements of financial conditions and operations within thirty (30) days of the close of each of the first three (3) fiscal quarters of each year. The statements shall include, at a minimum:

Account numbers;

Allotments;

Expenditures to-date;

Estimated expenditures to complete the fiscal year; and

Surplus or deficiency projections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 37, § 1.

35-3-18.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 62; P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 6; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 41, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 1, § 4.

35-3-19.
Availability of funds on failure of general assembly to pass appropriation bill.

In an emergency caused by a failure of the general assembly to pass the annual appropriation bill, the same amounts appropriated in the previous fiscal year shall be available for each department and division thereof, subject to monthly or quarterly allotments, in accordance with seasonal requirements, as determined by the budget officer; provided, that expenditures for payment of bonded indebtedness of the state and interest thereon shall be in such amounts as may be required, regardless of whether or not an annual appropriation bill is passed by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 62; G.L. 1956, §

35-3-19

.

35-3-20.
State budget reserve and cash stabilization account.

There is hereby created within the general fund a state budget reserve and cash stabilization account, which shall be administered by the state controller and which shall be used solely for the purpose of providing such sums as may be appropriated to fund any unanticipated general revenue deficit caused by a general revenue shortfall.

In carrying out the provisions of §

35-3-20.1

, the state controller shall, based on that fiscal year’s estimate, transfer the amounts needed to fund cash requirements during the fiscal year; the transfer shall be adjusted at the end of the fiscal year in order to conform to the requirements of §

35-3-20.1

. To the extent that funds so transferred are not needed by the Rhode Island Capital Plan fund the funds may be loaned back to the general fund.

For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, whenever the aggregate of the monies and securities held for the credit of the state budget reserve and cash stabilization account exceeds three and four tenths of one percent (3.4%) of total fiscal year resources, consisting of the aggregate of (1) actual revenues from taxes and other departmental general revenue sources; and (2) the general revenue balance available for appropriations at the beginning of the fiscal year; the excess shall be transferred to the Rhode Island Capital Plan fund, to be used solely for capital projects. Provided further, the applicable percentage shall increase by four-tenths of one percent (.4%) for the succeeding four (4) fiscal years as follows:

Fiscal year ending June 30, 20103.8%

Fiscal year ending June 30, 20114.2%

Fiscal year ending June 30, 20124.6%

Fiscal years ending June 30, 2013, and thereafter5.0%

At any time after the third quarter of a fiscal year, that it is indicated that total resources which are defined to be the aggregate of estimated general revenue, general revenue receivables, and available free surplus in the general fund will be less than the estimates upon which current appropriations were based, the general assembly may make appropriations from the state budget reserve and cash stabilization account for the difference between the estimated total resources and the original estimates upon which enacted appropriations were based, but only in the amount of the difference based upon the revenues projected at the latest state revenue estimating conference pursuant to chapter 16 of this title as reported by the chairperson of that conference.

Whenever a transfer has been made pursuant to subsection (d), that transfer shall be considered as estimated general revenues for the purposes of determining the amount to be transferred to the Rhode Island Capital Plan fund for the purposes of §

35-3-20.1(b)

.

Whenever a transfer has been made pursuant to subsection (d), the amount of the transfer shall be transferred to the Rhode Island Capital Plan fund from funds payable into the general revenue fund pursuant to §

35-3-20.1

in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the transfer was made, except that in fiscal year 2010 there shall be no repayment of the amount transferred, and the repayment shall be made in fiscal year 2011.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 26, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 58, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 16, § 11; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 80, art. 1, § 18; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.

35-3-20.1.
Limitation on state spending.

For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, no appropriation, supplemental appropriation, or budget act shall cause the aggregate state general revenue appropriations enacted for the fiscal year to exceed ninety-seven and eight tenths of one percent (97.8%) of the estimated state general revenues for the fiscal year from all sources, including estimated unencumbered general revenues not continued or reappropriated to the new fiscal year remaining at the end of the previous fiscal year. Estimated unencumbered general revenues are calculated by taking the estimated general revenue cash balance at the end of the fiscal year less estimated revenue anticipation bonds or notes, estimated general revenue encumbrances, estimated continuing general revenue appropriations, and the amount of the budget reserve and cash stabilization account at the end of the fiscal year. The amount of the general revenue estimate and estimated unencumbered general revenue remaining shall be determined by the state controller and approved by the auditor general in conformance with accounting procedures currently in use. The excess of any unencumbered general revenue shall be determined by subtracting from the actual unencumbered general revenues at the end of any fiscal year an amount which together with the latest estimated general revenues is necessary to fund the ensuing fiscal year’s general revenue budget, including the required estimated general revenue supplemental and annual appropriations. Provided further, the applicable percentage shall decrease by two-tenths of one percent (.2%) for the succeeding four (4) fiscal years as follows:

The amount between the applicable percentage in subsection (a) and one hundred percent (100%) of the estimated state general fund revenue for any fiscal year as estimated in accordance with subsection (a) shall be appropriated in any given fiscal year into the budget reserve and cash stabilization account; provided, that for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, no payment will be made which would increase the total of the budget reserve and cash stabilization account to more than three and four-tenths of one percent (3.4%) of only the estimated state general fund revenues as set by subsection (a). In the event that the payment to be made into the budget reserve and cash stabilization account would increase the amount in the account to more than three and four-tenths of one percent (3.4%) of estimated state general revenues, the amount shall be transferred to the Rhode Island Capital Plan fund, to be used solely for capital projects. Provided further the applicable percentage shall increase by four-tenths of one percent (.4%) for the four (4) succeeding fiscal years as follows:

However, there shall be no expenditures of money under this section without passage of a specific appropriation by the general assembly.

Within forty-five (45) days after the close of any fiscal year, all unencumbered general revenue in the year end surplus account from the fiscal year shall be transferred to the general fund.

Fiscal year ending June 30, 201097.6% Fiscal year ending June 30, 201197.4% Fiscal year ending June 30, 201297.2% Fiscal years ending June 30, 2013 and thereafter97.0%

Click to view

Fiscal year ending June 30, 20103.8% Fiscal year ending June 30, 20114.2% Fiscal year ending June 30, 20124.6% Fiscal years ending June 30, 2013 and thereafter5.0%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 83, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 26, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 58, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 17; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 8, § 1.

35-3-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 596, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 76, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 21, § 3, effective July 1, 1999.

35-3-22.
Affordable housing — rental subsidy account.

There is hereby created within the general fund an affordable housing rental subsidy account, which shall be administered by the state controller and which shall be used solely for the purpose of providing such sums as may be required to fund the affordable housing rental subsidy in accordance with chapter 11.2 of title 42.

At the end of each fiscal year following the completion of the post audit of the financial transactions of the state by the state auditor general but prior to the issuance of his or her final audit report as set forth in §

22-13-4

, the state controller shall transfer to the affordable housing rental subsidy account twenty percent (20%) of the amount payable into the general revenue fund pursuant to §

42-61-15

for each fiscal year.

In carrying out the provisions of subsection (b), the state controller shall initially, at the fiscal year opening, transfer the amount identified as that fiscal year’s projected estimate; the transfer shall be adjusted at the end of the fiscal year in order to conform to the requirements of subsection (b).

Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, for the period beginning July 1, 1994, and ending June 30, 1997, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation shall annually allocate funds sufficient to carry out the provisions of chapter 11.2 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 579, § 5; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 69, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 76, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 143, § 1.

35-3-23.
Interfund transfers.

The governor may make an interfund transfer. Prior to making an interfund transfer the governor shall give five (5) days written notification of the proposed interfund transfer to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the chairperson of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the house.

An interfund transfer must comply with this section. An interfund transfer can be made under the following circumstances and on the following conditions:

The governor must make the findings that:

All cash in the general fund, including the payroll clearing account, has been or is about to be exhausted;

The anticipated cash expenditures exceed the anticipated cash available.

The governor may make an interfund transfer to the general fund from the:

Temporary disability fund created in §

28-39-4

;

Intermodal surface transportation fund created in §

35-4-11

; and/or

Tobacco settlement financing trust fund created in §

42-133-9

.

Once in each fiscal quarter from each fund the governor may make an interfund transfer. The fund(s) from which money is transferred must be made whole by June 30th in the same fiscal year as the transfer is made.

The interfund transfer may be made notwithstanding the provisions of §§

28-37-3

and

28-39-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 70; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 21.